District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1971

Probationary employees; salary increases; termination.

Repealed.

History

May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 138, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(4)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1133.
1973 Ed., § 31-1533.